Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE D. STATE PURCHASING AND GENERAL SERVICES

CHAPTER 2151. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 2151.001. SHORT TITLE. This subtitle may be cited as the State Purchasing and General Services Act.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 2151.002. DEFINITION. Except as otherwise provided by this subtitle, in this subtitle, "state agency" means:

(1) a department, commission, board, office, or other agency in the executive branch of state government created by the state constitution or a state statute;

(2) the supreme court, the court of criminal appeals, a court of appeals, or the Texas Judicial Council; or

(3) a university system or an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, except a public junior college.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.199, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1035, Sec. 60, eff. June 19, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1422, Sec. 1.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 2151.003. REFERENCE. A statutory reference to the General Services Commission, the State Board of Control, the State Purchasing and General Services Commission, or the Texas Building and Procurement Commission means:

(1) the Texas Facilities Commission if the statutory reference concerns:

(A) charge and control of state buildings, grounds, or property;

(B) maintenance or repair of state buildings, grounds, or property;

(C) construction of a state building;

(D) purchase or lease of state buildings, grounds, or property by or for the state;

(E) child care services for state employees under Chapter 663; or

(F) surplus and salvage property; and

(2) the comptroller in all other circumstances, except as otherwise provided by law.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1422, Sec. 1.03, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 2151.004. TRANSFER AND ALLOCATION OF POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The powers and duties of the former General Services Commission under Chapter 2170 or other law relating to providing telecommunications services for state government are transferred to the Department of Information Resources.

(b) A reference in law to the General Services Commission that relates to the powers and duties of the former General Services Commission under Chapter 2170 or other law relating to providing telecommunications services for state government is a reference to the Department of Information Resources.

(c) The Texas Facilities Commission retains the powers and duties of the former Texas Building and Procurement Commission relating to charge and control of state buildings, grounds, or property, maintenance or repair of state buildings, grounds, or property, child care services for state employees under Chapter 663, surplus and salvage property, construction of a state building, or purchase or lease of state buildings, grounds, or property by or for the state.

(d) Except as provided by Subsection (a) or (c) or other law, all other powers and duties of the Texas Building and Procurement Commission are transferred to the comptroller.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1422, Sec. 1.04, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 2151.005. EXEMPTIONS RELATED TO LEGAL SERVICES. This subtitle does not apply to:

(1) obtaining outside legal counsel services;

(2) obtaining expert witnesses; or

(3) procuring litigation-related goods and services for which competitive procurement is not feasible under the circumstances.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 309, Sec. 7.04, eff. June 18, 2003.